Utah statutes.
59-5-202.   Severance tax -- Rate -- Computation -- Annual exemption.
(1)  Every person engaged in the business of mining or extracting
metalliferous minerals in this state shall pay to the state a severance tax
equal to 2.6% of the taxable value of all metals or metalliferous minerals
sold or otherwise disposed of.
(2)  If the metals or metalliferous minerals are shipped outside the state,
this constitutes a sale, and the finished metals or the recoverable units of
finished metals from the metalliferous minerals shipped are subject to the
severance tax.  If the metals or metalliferous minerals are stockpiled, the
tax is not applicable until they are sold or shipped out of state.  For
purposes of the tax imposed by this chapter, uranium concentrates shall be
considered to be finished metals.  The owner of the metals or metalliferous
minerals that are stockpiled shall report to the commission annually, in a
form acceptable to the commission, the amount of metalliferous minerals so
stockpiled.  Metals or metalliferous minerals that are stockpiled for more
than two years, however, are subject to the severance tax.
(3)  An annual exemption from the payment of the tax imposed by this chapter
upon the first $50,000 in gross value of the metalliferous mineral is allowed
to each mine.
(4)  These taxes are in addition to all other taxes provided by law and are
delinquent, unless otherwise deferred, on June 1 next succeeding the calendar
year when the metalliferous mineral is produced and sold or delivered.
